Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-20,188
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Biennial report to Secretary of State.

Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a biennial report as required under section 21-301 or 21-304.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 188;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 17.